src/noun-smj-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     Lule Sámi noun lexicon                                 !
! ========================================================================== !
LEXICON NounRoot
  Noun ;
  FirstComponent ;
  HyphNouns ;

LEXICON HyphNouns
cup CELSIUS ;
CD-rom CELSIUS ;
CD-singel GAHPER ; !^LOAN
P2-kanálla:P2-kan AREAL ;
cd-rom CELSIUS ;
y-kromosåvmmå:y-kromos AGRONOM ;
x-kromosåvmmå:x-kromos AGRONOM ;
tv-pro^grám0ma:tv-pro^gr TELEGRAM ;
e-mail GÅNÅGIS ; !^LOAN
